test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_vualaas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - vuálááš: # MLO, ok; long dift / long vowel in the 1st syll (comp to cissááš)
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Nom: vuálááš
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Gen: vuáˊláá
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Acc: vuáˊláá
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Ill: vuáˊlážân
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Loc: vuáˊláást
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Com: vuáˊláin
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Abe: vuáˊlááttáá
    vuálááš+N+Ess: vuáˊlážin # obs: cissáážin (áá)
    vuálááš+N+Par: vuáˊlážid # obs: cissáážid (áá)
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Nom: vuáˊlááh
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Gen: vuáˊlái
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Acc: vuáˊláid
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Ill: vuáˊláid
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Loc: vuáˊláin
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Com: vuáˊláiguin
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Abe: vuáˊláittáá
    
  Noun - kuálááš: # MLO, ok
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Nom: kuálááš
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Gen: kuáˊláá
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Acc: kuáˊláá
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Ill: kuáˊlážân
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Loc: kuáˊláást
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Com: kuáˊláin
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Abe: kuáˊlááttáá
    kuálááš+N+Ess: kuáˊlážin # obs: cissáážin (áá)
    kuálááš+N+Par: kuáˊlážid # obs: cissáážid (áá)
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Nom: kuáˊlááh
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Gen: kuáˊlái
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Acc: kuáˊláid
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Ill: kuáˊláid
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Loc: kuáˊláin
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Com: kuáˊláiguin
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Abe: kuáˊláittáá

   Noun - káánááš: # MLO, ok
    káánááš+N+Sg+Nom: káánááš
    káánááš+N+Sg+Gen: káánáá
    káánááš+N+Sg+Acc: káánáá
    káánááš+N+Sg+Ill: kánážân
    káánááš+N+Sg+Loc: káánáást
    káánááš+N+Sg+Com: kánáin
    káánááš+N+Sg+Abe: káánááttáá
    káánááš+N+Ess: kánážin # obs: cissáážin (áá)
    káánááš+N+Par: kánážid # obs: cissáážid (áá)
    káánááš+N+Pl+Nom: káánááh
    káánááš+N+Pl+Gen: kánái
    káánááš+N+Pl+Acc: kánáid
    káánááš+N+Pl+Ill: kánáid
    káánááš+N+Pl+Loc: kánáin
    káánááš+N+Pl+Com: kánáiguin
    káánááš+N+Pl+Abe: kánáittáá

 
   Noun - áálááš: # MLO, ok
    áálááš+N+Sg+Nom: áálááš
    áálááš+N+Sg+Gen: ááláá
    áálááš+N+Sg+Acc: ááláá
    áálááš+N+Sg+Ill: álážân
    áálááš+N+Sg+Loc: ááláást
    áálááš+N+Sg+Com: áláin
    áálááš+N+Sg+Abe: áálááttáá
    áálááš+N+Ess: álážin # obs: cissáážin (áá)
    áálááš+N+Par: álážid # obs: cissáážid (áá)
    áálááš+N+Pl+Nom: áálááh
    áálááš+N+Pl+Gen: álái
    áálááš+N+Pl+Acc: áláid
    áálááš+N+Pl+Ill: áláid
    áálááš+N+Pl+Loc: áláin
    áálááš+N+Pl+Com: áláiguin
    áálááš+N+Pl+Abe: áláittáá
